Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.020

Licenses—Application requirements.

A license shall be issued by the secretary authorizing the holder to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery. In order to procure a license to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, the applicant must provide the board evidence that a diploma has been issued to the applicant by an accredited school of osteopathic medicine and surgery, approved by the board. The application shall be made upon a form prepared by the secretary, with the approval of the board, and it shall contain such information concerning said osteopathic medical instruction and the preliminary education of the applicant as the board may by rule provide. Applicants who have failed to meet the requirements must be rejected.

An applicant for a license to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery must furnish evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she has served for not less than one year in a postgraduate training program approved by the board.

In addition, the applicant may be required to furnish evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she is physically and mentally capable of safely carrying on the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery. The board may require any applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as it deems necessary to determine an applicant's physical and/or mental capability to safely practice osteopathic medicine and surgery. The applicant shall also show that he or she has not been guilty of any conduct which would constitute grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of such license under the laws of the state of Washington.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the board from requiring such additional information from applicants as it deems necessary.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require any applicant for licensure, or any licensee, as a requisite of retaining or renewing licensure under this chapter, to be a member of any political and/or professional organization.

[ 1991 c 160 s 3; (1991 c 3 s 148 repealed by 1991 sp.s. c 11 s 2); 1979 c 117 s 11; 1959 c 110 s 1; 1919 c 4 s 4; RRS s 10056. Cf. 1909 c 192 s 6. Formerly RCW 18.57.020, 18.57.060, 18.57.070, and 18.57.090.]